District of Columbia statutes.
22-3305

Placing explosives with intent to destroy or injure property.

Whoever places, or causes to be placed, in, upon, under, against, or near to any building, car, vessel, monument, statue, or structure, gunpowder or any explosive substance of any kind whatsoever, with intent to destroy, throw down, or injure the whole or any part thereof, although no damage is done, shall be punished by a fine not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01 and by imprisonment for not less than 2 years or more than 10 years.

Mar. 3, 1901, ch. 854, § 825a
Mar. 3, 1905, 33 Stat. 1033, ch. 1461
Dec. 27, 1967, 81 Stat. 739, Pub. L. 90-226, title VI, § 607
June 11, 2013, D.C. Law 19-317, § 201(i), 60 DCR 2064
1981 Ed., § 22-3105.
1973 Ed., § 22-3105.
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-317 substituted “not more than the amount set forth in § 22-3571.01” for “not exceeding $1,000”.
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 201(i) of the Criminal Fine Proportionality Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-45, April 1, 2013, 60 DCR 5400, 20 DCSTAT 1300).
Applicability of D.C. Law 19-317: Section 401 of D.C. Law 19-317 provided that the act shall apply only to offenses committed on or after June 11, 2013.